Washington statutes.
RCW 2.68.050

Electronic access to judicial information.

The supreme court, the court of appeals and all superior and district courts, through the judicial information system committee, shall:

(1) Continue to plan for and implement processes for making judicial information available electronically;

(2) Promote and facilitate electronic access to the public of judicial information and services;

(3) Establish technical standards for such services;

(4) Consider electronic public access needs when planning new information systems or major upgrades of information systems;

(5) Develop processes to determine which judicial information the public most wants and needs;

(6) Increase capabilities to receive information electronically from the public and transmit forms, applications and other communications and transactions electronically;

(7) Use technologies that allow continuous access twenty-four hours a day, seven days per week, involve little or no cost to access, and are capable of being used by persons without extensive technology ability; and

(8) Consider and incorporate wherever possible ease of access to electronic technologies by persons with disabilities.

[ 1996 c 171 s 3.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—1996 c 171: "Section captions used in this act do not constitute any part of the law." [ 1996 c 171 s 16.]

Effective dates—1996 c 171: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 28, 1996], except for section 8 of this act, which takes effect June 30, 1997." [ 1996 c 171 s 19.]